Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 1. General Provisions

Cross references. —

As to general supervision and control by department of health, see §

9-2-102

.

For constitutional provision establishing charitable, reformatory and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to community mental health services, see §

35-1-611

et seq.

Applied

in

Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

Stated

in

Norman v. State, 747 P.2d 520,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 563

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Estate of Hilton, 72 Wyo. 389, 265 P.2d 747,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 43 A.L.R.2d 1429, 43 A.L.R. 1429 (1954).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming's Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums § 1 et seq.

Allowance of attorney's fee out of estate of alleged incompetent for services in connection with inquisition into sanity, 22 ALR2d 1438.

Constitutional right to jury trial in proceeding for adjudication of incompetency or insanity or for restoration, 33 ALR2d 1145.

Estate of incompetent as liable for care and maintenance furnished by public institution before incompetent acquired estate or property, 33 ALR2d 1257.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency proceedings, 87 ALR2d 950.

Right of public authorities to reach trust for benefit of incompetent in satisfaction of claim for support and maintenance in public institution, 92 ALR2d 838.

Constitutionality of statute imposing liability upon estate or relative of insane person for his support in an asylum, 20 ALR3d 363.

Liability of mental care facility for suicide of patient or former patient, 19 ALR4th 7.

Malpractice liability based on prior treatment of mental disorder alleged to relate to patient's conviction of crime, 28 ALR4th 712.

Right to notice and hearing prior to revocation of conditional release status of mental patient, 29 ALR4th 394.

Nonconsensual treatment of involuntarily committed mentally ill persons with neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs as violative of state constitutional guaranty, 74 ALR4th 1099.

Right of state prison authorities to administer neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs to prisoner without his or her consent—state cases, 75 ALR4th 1124.

57 C.J.S. Mental Health §§ 21 to 44, 203 to 208.

§ 25-10-101.
Definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Court” means the district court which ordered detention, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization of the person pursuant to this act, or the district court in the county where the person resides, is found or is hospitalized;

“Dangerous to himself or others” means that, as a result of mental illness, a person:

Evidences a substantial probability of physical harm to himself as manifested by evidence of recent threats of or attempts at suicide or serious bodily harm; or

Evidences a substantial probability of physical harm to other individuals as manifested by a recent overt homicidal act, attempt or threat or other violent act, attempt or threat which places others in reasonable fear of serious physical harm to them; or

Evidences behavior manifested by recent acts or omissions that, due to mental illness, he is unable to satisfy basic needs for nourishment, essential medical care, shelter or safety so that a substantial probability exists that death, serious physical injury, serious physical debilitation, serious mental debilitation, destabilization from lack of or refusal to take prescribed psychotropic medications for a diagnosed condition or serious physical disease will imminently ensue, unless the individual receives prompt and adequate treatment for this mental illness. No person, however, shall be deemed to be unable to satisfy his need for nourishment, essential medical care, shelter or safety if he is able to satisfy those needs with the supervision and assistance of others who are willing and available;

While this definition requires evidence of recent acts or omissions of endangerment, either to self or others, a court may consider a person’s mental health history in determining whether directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization is warranted.

“Department” means the state department of health;

“Examiner” means a licensed psychiatrist, a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed psychologist, a licensed professional counselor, a licensed addictions therapist, a licensed clinical social worker or a licensed marriage and family therapist;

“Head of hospital” means the individual in charge of a hospital or his designee. When this act requires or authorizes the head of a hospital to perform an act which involves the practice of medicine, the act shall be performed by a physician;

“Hospital” means a facility designated pursuant to W.S.

25-10-104

or the state hospital;

“Mental health center” means a community human services program for the prevention, treatment and amelioration of mental illness under W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-627

or an equivalently staffed and equipped student health service;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 172, § 3.

“Mental illness” and “mentally ill” mean a physical, emotional, mental or behavioral disorder which causes a person to be dangerous to himself or others and which requires treatment, but do not include addiction to drugs or alcohol, drug or alcohol intoxication or developmental disabilities, except when one (1) or more of those conditions co-occurs as a secondary diagnosis with a mental illness;

“Patient” means an individual receiving treatment pursuant to this act;

“Physician” means an individual licensed under the laws of this state to practice medicine, or a physician in the service of the United States government while in this state in the performance of his official duties;

“State hospital” means the Wyoming state hospital at Evanston, Wyoming;

“Treatment” means diagnosis, evaluation, intervention, which may include psychiatric medication, individual and group mental health counseling, illness management diversion services such as immediate linkages to mental health services in the community and discharge planning. Treatment shall begin at the time of detention, if the person knowingly and voluntarily consents, and shall continue throughout involuntary hospitalization or directed outpatient commitment. Treatment may be given without the consent of the detained person or his parent or guardian when treatment is limited to diagnosis or evaluation or when treatment is necessary to prevent immediate and serious physical harm to the person or others. “Treatment” does not include observation or supervision;

“Treatment center” or “treatment provider” means as defined by department rule;

“Resident” means a United States citizen who has been a resident of and domiciled in Wyoming for not less than ninety (90) days and who has not claimed residency elsewhere for the purpose of obtaining medical or psychiatric services during that ninety (90) day period immediately preceding the date when services under this act were sought or imposed. “Resident” also includes any alien who has resided continuously in Wyoming for at least ninety (90) days immediately prior to the date when services under this act were sought or imposed. “Resident” also includes any active duty member, the spouse or minor child of any active duty member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in Wyoming;

“Gatekeeper” means the single point of responsibility which may be designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g);

“This act” means W.S.

25-10-101

through

25-10-305

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 25-49; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1999, ch. 172, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 155, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2011, ch. 54, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision fixing the location of the state hospital and providing that an election shall be necessary to change the permanent location of such institution, see art. 7, § 23, Wyo. Const.

As to department of health, see §§

9-2-101

through

9-2-108

.

As to licensing of physicians generally, see §§

33-26-301

through

33-26-307

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xiv), substituted “25-10-305” for “25-10-404.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(ix), inserted “but do not include addiction to drugs or alcohol, drug or alcohol intoxication or developmental disabilities, except when one (1) or more of those conditions co-occurs as a secondary diagnosis with a mental illness”; and in (a)(xiii), rewrote the subsection to expand the definition of “treatment.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iv), substituted “an advanced practice registered nurse” for “a licensed advanced practitioner of nursing,” and added the present last sentence.

The 2016 amendment

inserted “directed outpatient commitment” following “detention” and “involuntary” preceding “hospitalization” in (a)(i); added (a)(ii)(D); in (a)(iv) substituted “a licensed” for “an advanced” and “a licensed physician assistant” for “with a clinical specialty in psychiatric and mental health nursing working in collaboration with a licensed physician,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read, “For purposes of emergency detention proceedings only, ‘examiner’ includes a licensed physician's assistant; ”inserted “or directed outpatient commitment” following “hospitalization” in (a)(xiii); redesignated (a)(xiv) as (a)(xvii); and added (a)(xiv) and (a)(xvi).

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, substituted "behavioral health center as defined by W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xvi), other provider" for "community human services program for the prevention, treatment and amelioration of mental illness" in (a)(vii); and deleted ", except when one (1) or more of those conditions co-occurs as a secondary diagnosis with a mental illness" at the end of (a)(ix).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 216, § 1, provides:

“(a) There is appropriated three hundred eighty-three thousand six hundred sixty dollars ($383,660.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the Wyoming state hospital, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to implement a program to treat individuals with co-occurring diagnoses of serious, persistent mental illness and alcohol/substance abuse, dependence or addiction. The program shall provide initial psychiatric symptom stabilization, followed by a treatment intervention, using multi-therapeutic interventions to include social integration and rehabilitation, vocational guidance and individualized recovery and rehabilitation goals to manage the person's mental illness and substance abuse issues.

“(b) The Wyoming state hospital is authorized eight (8) full-time equivalent positions to implement the program specified in subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) The department of health shall include a request in its 2009-2010 standard budget request for purposes of continuing funding of the program specified in subsection (a) of this section and the positions authorized under subsection (b) of this section.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Section constitutional. —

This section is constitutional, as it constitutes a reasonable attempt by the state legislature to balance the interests of the mentally ill individual against the interests of the state. Moore v. Wyoming Medical Ctr., 825 F. Supp. 1531, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9647 (D. Wyo. 1993).

Applicability. —

Court was not required to construe language contained in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-8-104(g), pertaining to an application for a permit to carry a concealed weapon, solely in light of definition of “dangerous to himself or others” set out in subdivision (a)(ii) of this section. Mecikalski v. Office of the AG, 2 P.3d 1039,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2000).

Dangerousness to self. —

The evidence, including defendant's history of mental illness, and past hospitalizations which showed a pattern of recurring improvement on medication and then deterioration when he stopped taking his medication, and recent acts or omissions demonstrating defendant was unable to satisfy his need for medical care so that serious mental destabilization from his refusal to take psychotropic medications for his diagnosed condition had occurred, overwhelmingly supported a finding of dangerousness to himself under § 25-10-101(a)(ii)(C)Baker v. State, 2002 WY 116, 50 P.3d 712,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2002).

District court did not err in finding the inmate mentally ill as defined because she had a physical, emotional, mental or behavioral disorder, which caused her to be dangerous to herself in that she evidenced a substantial probability of physical harm to herself as manifested by evidence of recent threats of or attempts at serious bodily harm and which required treatment. ASM v. State, 2021 WY 109, 496 P.3d 764,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2021).

Mental health history. —

While requiring evidence of recent acts of endangerment, § 25-10-101(a)(ii)(C) does not prohibit courts from considering a person's mental health history in determining whether involuntary hospitalization is warranted. Baker v. State, 2002 WY 116, 50 P.3d 712,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

K.C. v. State, 771 P.2d 774,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1989); Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2005).

Cited

in

Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001); Keats v. State, 2003 WY 19, 64 P.3d 104,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2003); Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003); United States v. Bradley, 417 F.3d 1107,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 15477

(2005); State ex rel. W. Park Hosp. Dist. v. Skoric, 2014 WY 41,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Mar 25, 2014).

Cited in

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

§ 25-10-101.
Definitions. [Effective July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Court” means the district court which ordered detention, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization of the person pursuant to this act, or the district court in the county where the person resides, is found or is hospitalized;

“Dangerous to himself or others” means that, as a result of mental illness, a person:

Evidences a substantial probability of physical harm to himself as manifested by evidence of recent threats of or attempts at suicide or serious bodily harm; or

Evidences a substantial probability of physical harm to other individuals as manifested by a recent overt homicidal act, attempt or threat or other violent act, attempt or threat which places others in reasonable fear of serious physical harm to them; or

Evidences behavior manifested by recent acts or omissions that, due to mental illness, he is unable to satisfy basic needs for nourishment, essential medical care, shelter or safety so that a substantial probability exists that death, serious physical injury, serious physical debilitation, serious mental debilitation, destabilization from lack of or refusal to take prescribed psychotropic medications for a diagnosed condition or serious physical disease will imminently ensue, unless the individual receives prompt and adequate treatment for this mental illness. No person, however, shall be deemed to be unable to satisfy his need for nourishment, essential medical care, shelter or safety if he is able to satisfy those needs with the supervision and assistance of others who are willing and available;

While this definition requires evidence of recent acts or omissions of endangerment, either to self or others, a court may consider a person’s mental health history in determining whether directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization is warranted.

“Department” means the state department of health;

“Examiner” means a licensed psychiatrist, a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed physician assistant, a licensed psychologist, a licensed professional counselor, a licensed addictions therapist, a licensed clinical social worker or a licensed marriage and family therapist;

“Head of hospital” means the individual in charge of a hospital or his designee. When this act requires or authorizes the head of a hospital to perform an act which involves the practice of medicine, the act shall be performed by a physician;

“Hospital” means a facility designated pursuant to W.S.

25-10-104

or the state hospital;

“Mental health center” means a behavioral health center as defined by W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xvi), other provider under W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-627

or an equivalently staffed and equipped student health service;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 172, § 3.

“Mental illness” and “mentally ill” mean a physical, emotional, mental or behavioral disorder which causes a person to be dangerous to himself or others and which requires treatment, but do not include addiction to drugs or alcohol, drug or alcohol intoxication or developmental disabilities;

“Patient” means an individual receiving treatment pursuant to this act;

“Physician” means an individual licensed under the laws of this state to practice medicine, or a physician in the service of the United States government while in this state in the performance of his official duties;

“State hospital” means the Wyoming state hospital at Evanston, Wyoming;

“Treatment” means diagnosis, evaluation, intervention, which may include psychiatric medication, individual and group mental health counseling, illness management diversion services such as immediate linkages to mental health services in the community and discharge planning. Treatment shall begin at the time of detention, if the person knowingly and voluntarily consents, and shall continue throughout involuntary hospitalization or directed outpatient commitment. Treatment may be given without the consent of the detained person or his parent or guardian when treatment is limited to diagnosis or evaluation or when treatment is necessary to prevent immediate and serious physical harm to the person or others. “Treatment” does not include observation or supervision;

“Treatment center” or “treatment provider” means as defined by department rule;

“Resident” means a United States citizen who has been a resident of and domiciled in Wyoming for not less than ninety (90) days and who has not claimed residency elsewhere for the purpose of obtaining medical or psychiatric services during that ninety (90) day period immediately preceding the date when services under this act were sought or imposed. “Resident” also includes any alien who has resided continuously in Wyoming for at least ninety (90) days immediately prior to the date when services under this act were sought or imposed. “Resident” also includes any active duty member, the spouse or minor child of any active duty member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in Wyoming;

“Gatekeeper” means the single point of responsibility which may be designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g);

“This act” means W.S.

25-10-101

through

25-10-305

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 25-49; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1999, ch. 172, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 155, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2011, ch. 54, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 25-10-102.
Admittees subject to rules and regulations of department.

All persons admitted to the state hospital shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 25-50; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "department " for "state hospital" in the section heading and at the end.

§ 25-10-103.
Admission of persons with mental illness to hospital or treatment center.

Subject to the rules and regulations of the department, a hospital or any other treatment provider providing treatment under this act may admit persons who have symptoms of mental illness for treatment in their hospital or treatment center.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 25-51; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

rewrote the section, which formerly read, “Subject to the rules and regulations of the hospital, the head of a hospital may admit persons who have symptoms of mental illness pursuant to W.S.

25-10-106

,

25-10-109

or

25-10-110

.”

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

Quoted in

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 6, 2013).

§ 25-10-104.
Duties of department of health as to hospitals other than state hospital.

The department, with respect to hospitals or other treatment providers other than the state hospital, shall:

Adopt standards for the designation of hospitals or other licensed treatment providers as qualified to accept patients and provide treatment under this act;

Designate hospitals or other treatment providers which qualify to provide services under this act;

Enter into contracts or agreements with designated hospitals or other treatment providers for the treatment of patients with mental illness;

Require information from designated hospitals and other treatment providers concerning the services rendered to patients under the provisions of this act;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 3.

Investigate complaints made by or on behalf of patients with mental illness; and

Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this act, including rules regarding reimbursement under W.S.

25-10-112

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 25-52; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-104

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 2006, ch. 111, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective March 11, 2016.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department,” see § 25-10-101(a)(iii).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “designated” in the introductory language of (a), in (a), inserted “or other licensed treatment facilities” throughout; inserted “accept patients and” in (i); in (iii), inserted “inpatient” and added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 2, in (a), substituted “hospitals or other treatment providers” for “designated hospitals or other licensed treatment facilities”; substituted “providers” for “facilities” in (a)(i); rewrote (a)(ii), which formerly read, “Designate hospitals or other licensed treatment facilities which qualify under the standards adopted pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection”; rewrote (a)(iii), which formerly read, “Enter into contracts with designated hospitals or other licensed treatment facilities for the inpatient treatment of persons with mental illness, and other services incident to the hospitalization of patients. Designated hospitals or other licensed treatment facilities having a contract with the department shall receive individuals detained under W.S.

25-10-109

”; in (a)(iv), substituted “reports” for “information” and “treatment providers” for “licensed treatment facilities”; and in (a)(vii), inserted “for the administration of this act” following “regulations.”

The second
2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 3, repealed former (a)(v), which read: "Visit each designated hospital and each other licensed treatment facilities at least once a year to review methods of treatment for all patients with mental illness."

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a)(i) and (a)(iv), see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

Quoted

in

K.C. v. State, 771 P.2d 774,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 25-10-105.
Duties of department of health as to state hospital.

The department shall:

Adopt standards governing the state hospital;

Visit the state hospital to review methods of treatment of patients; and

Investigate complaints made by or on behalf of state hospital patients.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 25-53; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-105

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 25-10-106.
Voluntary applications for admission.

The head of a hospital may admit for treatment any adult who has symptoms of mental illness but who has sufficient insight or capacity to make responsible, voluntary application for admission and who applies for admission.

A person who has symptoms of mental illness but because of minority or incompetency is not capable of making a responsible, voluntary application for admission may be admitted for treatment upon application by a parent or guardian if the application:

Is accompanied by a statement of an examiner that the person is mentally ill; and

An examiner at the hospital, based on a personal interview, determines that the person is mentally ill.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 25-54; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

25-3-106

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

§ 25-10-107.
When voluntary patients shall be discharged.

The head of a hospital shall discharge any patient admitted pursuant to W.S. 25-10-106(a) or (b) who no longer needs hospital treatment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 25-57; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-109; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 25-3-108; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1.

§ 25-10-108.
Release upon request; exceptions; discharge plan.

A patient admitted pursuant to W.S.

25-10-106

who requests his release in writing or whose release is requested in writing by the person responsible for his care or custody, shall be released within twenty-four (24) hours after receipt of the request except:

If the patient was admitted on his own application and the request for release is made by a person other than the patient, release may be conditioned upon the consent of the patient; or

If the patient is a minor or incompetent, his release may be conditioned upon the consent of his parent or guardian.

The hospital shall prepare a discharge plan in accordance with policies, rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 25-56; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-108; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 25-3-109; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of conditions imposed when releasing person committed to institution as consequence of acquittal of crime on ground of insanity, 2 ALR4th 934.